Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Selling Personal Property to, or Doing Repair Work, for Counties
[Repealed]

§§ 19-13-71 through 19-13-79.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1990, ch. 425, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1990).

§19-13-71. [Codes, 1942, § 2940-11; Laws, 1950, ch. 246, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 247, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 295, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 4]

§19-13-73. [Codes, 1942, § 2940-11.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 246]

§19-13-75. [Codes, 1942, § 2940-12; Laws, 1950, ch. 246, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 247, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 27]

§19-13-77. [Codes, 1942, §§ 2940-13, 2940-14; Laws, 1950, ch. 246, §§ 5, 6; Laws, 1962, ch. 247, § 3]

§19-13-79. [Codes, 1942, § 2940-15; Laws, 1950, ch. 246, § 7]